North Dakota, session 69, HB1617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - TRIBAL
SCHOOL INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $100,000, or so much
of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of public instruction for the purpose of
providing infrastructure grants to tribal elementary and secondary schools, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 1 25.1324.01000